Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-52] Objectives of biosecurity
program. The objectives of the biosecurity program shall be to:

(1) Establish a multi-dimensional system to prevent
the entry into the State and interisland movement of pests and prohibited or
restricted organisms without a permit; and

(2) Respond effectively to eradicate, control,
reduce, and suppress incipient pest populations and established pests and seize
and dispose of prohibited or restricted organisms without a permit. [L 2008, c
236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next